Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-12,106
Person cannot abandon a motorboat.

No person shall cause any motorboat to be abandoned as described in subdivision (1)(a), (b), or (c) of section 37-1299.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 19.